Massachusetts, session 194th, S1877.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94 B of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2000 Official
Edition is hereby amended by adding the words "police department" after the word department in
line 5.
of 1